Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-748.09
Partial enforcement.

If a tribunal of this state does not recognize and enforce a Convention support order in its entirety, it shall enforce any severable part of the order. An application or direct request may seek recognition and partial enforcement of a Convention support order.

Laws 2015, LB415, § 56.